Washington statutes.
RCW 36.125.010

Counties authorized to establish—Purpose—Role.

(1)(a) The legislative authority for each county that borders the marine waters of southern Puget Sound may establish marine resources committees consistent with the procedures outlined in RCW 36.125.020. Counties authorized to establish marine resources committees in the southern Puget Sound are: King, Pierce, Thurston, Kitsap, and Mason counties.

(b) The legislative authority for each county bordering the marine waters of the outer coast may develop a marine resources committee consistent with the procedures outlined in RCW 36.125.020. Counties authorized to establish marine resources committees on the outer coast are: Pacific, Grays Harbor, and Wahkiakum counties.

(c) Jefferson and Clallam counties may establish a new marine resources committee or a subcommittee of the county's existing marine resources committee, consistent with the procedures outlined in RCW 36.125.020, specifically to address the marine ecosystems for the outer coast or Puget Sound, where appropriate.

(2) The mission of a marine resources committee created under this section is to address, utilizing sound science, the needs of the marine ecosystem local to the county initiating the marine resources committee.

(3) A marine resources committee created under this section should review current data and resource conservation and management programs and make prioritized recommendations for additional measures that might be necessary to enhance protection of marine resources.

(4) The role of a marine resources committee in developing recommendations includes, but is not limited to:

(a) Utilizing existing data and, to the extent necessary, helping to gather new data on the health of local marine resources;

(b) Making scientifically based recommendations on local candidate sites for marine protected areas;

(c) Working closely with local and state officials to help implement recommendations of the marine resources committee;

(d) Promoting public outreach and education around marine resource conservation and management issues; and

(e) Engaging in any other activities that the initiating county deems appropriate.

[ 2007 c 344 s 2.]